Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-189
Credential; discipline; hearing; notice; how served.

Notice of the filing of a petition pursuant to section 38-186 and of the time and place of hearing shall be served upon the credential holder at least ten days before the hearing. The notice may be served by any method specified in section 25-505.01, or the director may permit substitute or constructive service as provided in section 25-517.02 when service cannot be made with reasonable diligence by any of the methods specified in section 25-505.01.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 53, p. 468;

C.S.1929, § 71-608;

R.S.1943, § 71-154;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 51;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 43;

Laws 1991, LB 456, § 13;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 32;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-154;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 89.